Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2309.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "alcohol service personnel," "case," "catered function," "container" and "manufacture" in section 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words or phrases, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:* * *"Alcohol service personnel" shall mean any employe of a licensee such as a bartender, waiter or, in the case of a distributor or importing distributor, a salesperson whose primary responsibility includes the resale, furnishing or serving of liquor or malt or brewed beverages. It shall also mean any employe, such as a doorperson, whose primary responsibility is to ascertain the age of individuals who are attempting to enter the licensed premises. An employe of an alcohol licensee, distributor or importing distributor may be simultaneously considered to be cannabinoid service personnel.* * *"Cannabinoid service personnel" shall mean an employe of a hemp-derived cannabinoid licensee such as a bartender, waiter or, in the case of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor, a salesperson whose primary responsibility includes the resale, furnishing or serving of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages. The term shall also mean an employe, such as a doorperson, whose primary responsibility is to ascertain the age 20260HB2309PN3037 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of individuals who are attempting to enter the licensed premises. An employe of a hemp-derived cannabinoid licensee, hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor may be simultaneously considered to be alcohol service personnel."Case" shall mean a package prepared by the manufacturer for sale or distribution of twelve or more original containers totaling two hundred sixty-four or more fluid ounces of malt or brewed beverages excepting those packages containing twenty-four or more original containers each holding seven fluid ounces or more. In the context of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, the term shall mean a package prepared by the manufacturer for sale or distribution of four or more final containers, totaling at least forty-eight fluid ounces of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage."Catered function" shall mean the furnishing of food prepared on the premises or brought onto the premises already prepared in conjunction with alcoholic beverages and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for the accommodation of a person or an identifiable group of people, not the general public, who made arrangements for the function at least thirty days in advance.* * *"Container" shall mean and include any receptacle, vessel or form of package, tank, vat, cask, barrel, drum, keg, can, bottle or conduit used or capable of use for holding, storing, transferring or shipment of alcohol, liquor [or], malt or brewed beverages or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages .* * *"Final container" shall mean a bottle, can, keg or other suitable container that has been securely capped, sealed or 20260HB2309PN3037 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corked by the manufacturer of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage at the place of manufacture, with the name and address of the manufacturer permanently affixed to the bottle, can, keg or other suitable container or, in the case of a bottle or can, to the cap or cork used in sealing the bottle or can or to a label securely affixed to a bottle or can.* * *"Hemp" shall mean the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of the plant, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3% on a dry-weight basis."Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage" shall mean a beverage containing THC derived solely and exclusively from hemp.* * *"Manufacture", when the term is applied to malt or brewed beverages, shall mean and include all means, methods and processes used, employed and made use of, to produce, make and manufacture for commercial purposes, malt or brewed beverages from raw materials; when applied otherwise, it shall mean and include all means, methods and processes used, employed and made use of, to produce and make alcohol or liquor from raw materials, and shall mean and include rectification and blending of alcohol and liquor, the production, recovery or reuse of alcohol in the making, developing, using in the process of manufacture, denaturing, redistilling or recovering of any alcohol or liquor in distilleries, denaturing plants and wineries. When the term is applied to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, the term shall mean and include all means, methods and processes used, employed and made use of to derive THC from hemp and blend or otherwise add the THC to other ingredients to 20260HB2309PN3037 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 make an ingestible mixture or preparation.* * *"THC" shall mean tetrahydrocannabinols.* * *Section 2. Sections 207(b)(1), 210(a) introductory paragraph, 211(a)(1), (2), (3), (4) and (7), 217(a) and (b), 431(a.2), 438(b) and (c) and 471.1(a), (b), (d), (e), (f) and (h) of the act are amended to read:Section 207. General Powers of Board.--Under this act, the board shall have the power and its duty shall be:* * *(b) The following shall apply:(1) To control the manufacture, possession, sale, consumption, importation, use, storage, transportation and delivery of liquor, alcohol [and], malt or brewed beverages and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in accordance with the provisions of this act, and to fix the wholesale and retail prices at which liquors and alcohol shall be sold at Pennsylvania Liquor Stores.* * *Section 210. Restrictions on Members of the Board and Certain Employes of Commonwealth.--(a) A member or employe of the board or enforcement bureau or a member of the immediate family of a member or employe of the board or enforcement bureau shall not be directly or indirectly interested or engaged in any other business or undertaking within the Commonwealth dealing in liquor, alcohol, [or] malt or brewed beverages or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, whether as owner, part owner, partner, member of syndicate, holder of stock exceeding five percent (5%) of the equity at fair market value of the business, independent 20260HB2309PN3037 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contractor or manager of a licensed establishment required under 40 Pa. Code § 5.23 (relating to appointment of managers), and whether for his own benefit or in a fiduciary capacity for some other person. For the purpose of this subsection only, "employe of the board or Enforcement Bureau" shall mean any individual employed by the board or Enforcement Bureau who is responsible for taking or recommending official action of a nonministerial nature with regard to:* * *Section 211. Enforcement.--(a) There is created within the Pennsylvania State Police a Bureau of Liquor Control Enforcement which shall be responsible for enforcing this act and any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. Officers and investigators assigned to the bureau shall have the power and their duty shall be:(1) To investigate whenever there are reasonable grounds to believe liquor, alcohol [or], malt or brewed beverages or hemp- derived cannabinoid beverages are being sold on premises not licensed under the provisions of this act. If the investigation produces evidence of the unlawful sale of liquor [or], malt or brewed beverages or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or any other violation of the provisions of this act, the officer involved in the investigation shall institute criminal proceedings against the person or persons believed to have been criminally liable, as otherwise provided by law or rule of court.(2) To arrest on view, except in private homes, without warrant, any person actually engaged in the unlawful sale, importation, manufacture or transportation or having unlawful possession of liquor, alcohol [or], malt or brewed beverages or 20260HB2309PN3037 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages contrary to the provisions of this act or any other law of this Commonwealth or any person whom the officer/investigator, while in the performance of his assigned duties under and pursuant to this act and any regulations promulgated under this act, observes to be in violation of any of the following provisions:18 Pa.C.S. § 3302 (relating to causing or risking catastrophe).18 Pa.C.S. § 3304 (relating to criminal mischief).18 Pa.C.S. § 4101 (relating to forgery).18 Pa.C.S. § 5503 (relating to disorderly conduct).18 Pa.C.S. § 5505 (relating to public drunkenness).18 Pa.C.S. § 5512 (relating to lotteries, etc.).18 Pa.C.S. § 5513 (relating to gambling devices, gambling, etc.).18 Pa.C.S. § 5514 (relating to pool selling and bookmaking).18 Pa.C.S. § 6307 (relating to misrepresentation of age to secure liquor or malt or brewed beverages).18 Pa.C.S. § 6308 (relating to purchase, consumption, possession or transportation of liquor or malt or brewed beverages).18 Pa.C.S. § 6309 (relating to representing that minor is of age).18 Pa.C.S. § 6310.1 (relating to selling or furnishing liquor or malt or brewed beverages to minors).18 Pa.C.S. § 6310.3 (relating to carrying a false identification card).(3) Upon reasonable and probable cause, to search for and to seize, without warrant or process, except in private homes, any 20260HB2309PN3037 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 liquor, alcohol [or], malt or brewed beverages or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages unlawfully possessed, manufactured, sold, imported or transported and any stills, equipment, materials, utensils, vehicles, boats, vessels, animals, aircraft, or any of them, which are or have been used in the unlawful manufacture, sale, importation or transportation of the same. Such liquor, alcohol, malt or brewed beverages, hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, stills, equipment, materials, utensils, vehicles, boats, vessels, animals or aircraft so seized shall be disposed of as hereinafter provided.(4) To investigate and issue citations for any violations of this act or any laws of this Commonwealth relating to liquor, alcohol [or], malt or brewed beverages or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, or any regulations of the board adopted pursuant to such laws or any violation of any laws of this Commonwealth or of the Federal Government, relating to the payment of taxes on liquor, alcohol [or], malt or brewed beverages or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages by any licensee, his officers, servants, agents or employes.* * *(7) To arrange for the administration of chemical tests of breath, blood or urine, including preliminary breath tests, to persons for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of blood or the presence of a controlled substance by qualified personnel of a State or local police department or qualified personnel of a clinical laboratory licensed and approved by the Department of Health. The following apply:(i) The presence of THC in an individual tested by the bureau shall be considered to be a result of the lawful use of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages as outlined in this act 20260HB2309PN3037 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unless the totality of the circumstances indicates otherwise.(ii) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent officers of the bureau or investigators of the bureau from investigating, detaining, taking into custody or conducting other actions that are considered standard when interacting with an individual intoxicated by alcohol when officers and investigators interact with an individual intoxicated by hemp-derived THC.* * *Section 217. Biennial Reports.--(a) The board's Bureau of Alcohol Education shall prepare a report on [underage alcohol drinking and high-risk college alcohol drinking] the underage consumption of alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in this Commonwealth.(b) A report shall be prepared biennially and shall address the following:(1) Current levels and trends of underage [alcohol drinking] and high-risk college [alcohol drinking] consumption of alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in this Commonwealth.(2) Current programs conducted by State agencies to prevent underage alcohol drinking and high-risk college [alcohol drinking] consumption of alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(3) Current science that better defines and suggests proven prevention strategies for underage [alcohol drinking] and high-risk college [alcohol drinking] consumption of alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.* * *Section 431. Malt and Brewed Beverages Manufacturers', Distributors' and Importing Distributors' Licenses.--* * *20260HB2309PN3037 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a.2) The board shall issue to a holder of a manufacturer's license no more than [two] five storage licenses per manufacturer to cover storage facilities separate from the location of the manufacturing facility. A manufacturer may use its storage facilities to receive, store, repackage, sell and distribute malt or brewed beverages in the same manner as it can at its place of manufacture or it may rent, lease or otherwise acquire space from an importing distributor or bailee for hire authorized by this act in the same manner as an out of State manufacturer as set forth in subsection (a.1). A separate written application must be filed to acquire storage licenses, and the board is empowered to establish what information must be provided on that application. Nothing in this act authorizing off-site storage facilities for manufacturers is intended to make any change in the manner malt or brewed beverages are distributed through the three-tier system.* * *Section 438. Number and Kinds of Licenses Allowed Same Licensee.--* * *(b) No person shall possess or be issued more than one distributor's or importing distributor's license[.], except that a person may possess both a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license and a distributor's license, or a person may possess both a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor's license and an importing distributor's license.(c) No person shall possess more than one class of license, except that [a]:(1) A holder of a retail dispenser's license may also be a holder of a retail liquor license: Provided, however, That nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit 20260HB2309PN3037 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a member of the governing board of a public authority created under subdivision (n) of Article XXIII of the act of August 9, 1955 (P.L.323, No.130), known as "The County Code," from having an interest in a distributor or importing distributor license notwithstanding the fact that the public authority has an interest in one or more retail licenses or acts as a landlord for one or more retail licenses: And, provided further, That, notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an entity may acquire both a manufacturer's license or a limited winery license and a hotel, restaurant or retail dispenser license for use at the same location and more than one location may be so licensed. The licenses and a person's interest in the licenses or in the entity holding the licenses shall not be subject to this section.(2) A holder of a license that grants the ability to manufacture, sell, transport, distribute or import alcohol may also hold a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license of the same or equivalent class. The board shall promulgate regulations clarifying equivalent classes between alcohol licenses and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages licenses.Section 471.1. Responsible Alcohol Management.--(a) The board is authorized to offer a responsible alcohol service program to licensees. The program shall consist of four parts: new employe orientation, training for [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel, manager/owner training and the displaying of responsible alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage service signage. New employe orientation shall consist of orienting newly hired [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel as to Pennsylvania law relating to the sale, furnishing or serving of alcoholic 20260HB2309PN3037 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 beverages and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to minors and visibly intoxicated persons. It shall also mean orienting newly hired [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel to responsible server practices, as the term is defined by the board, through regulation. Training for [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel shall be as set forth by the board, but at minimum it shall consist of training to prevent service of alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to minors and to visibly intoxicated persons. Manager/owner training shall be as set forth by the board, but at a minimum it shall consist of training on how to monitor employes, proper service of alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and how to develop an appropriate alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage service policy. The responsible alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage service signage shall be as set forth by the board and shall consist of signage dealing with the licensee's policy against sales to minors and visibly intoxicated persons. [Alcohol] Alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel training may be conducted by the board or by an entity certified by the board to conduct such training.(b) The board shall be authorized to certify and decertify entities that wish to offer training for [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel. The training entity and the board shall maintain records establishing the names of individuals who have successfully undergone [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel training.* * *(d) In order to be considered in compliance with this section for purposes of section 471, a restaurant, retail dispenser, eating place, hotel, club, catering club, distributor 20260HB2309PN3037 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and importing distributor or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licensee shall:(1) have at least fifty per centum of its [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel certified as having successfully completed an [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid beverage servers training;(2) have its manager or owner certified as having successfully completed manager/owner training;(3) have all [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel undergo new employe orientation; and(4) have appropriate responsible [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service signage posted on the licensed premises.For purposes of this section, an owner is an individual who owns at least twenty-five per centum of the licensed entity.(e) Licensees ordered to comply with this act pursuant to section 471 who change managers shall have sixty calendar days to have the new manager trained as required by this section. If a licensee ordered to comply with this act pursuant to section 471 hires additional [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel, those additional employes shall be deemed to have been certified from their date of hire if they successfully complete an [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid serving program within sixty days of their date of hire.(f) Upon completion of a certified [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel program or the board's owner/manager training program, the participant will be certified by the training entity or the board as having successfully completed the program. Said certification will be valid for two years. The licensee shall keep records of the 20260HB2309PN3037 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certification status of its employes, managers and owners, including the name of the employe, manager or owner and the date of that individual's certification, in the same manner as it keeps other business records pursuant to [section] sections 493(12) and 419-A. The licensee shall also keep records of its new employe orientation program and records of its responsible [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service signage as set forth by the board by regulation.* * *(h) Unless successfully completed prior to being hired, all [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel shall be required to complete the training for [alcohol] alcohol/cannabinoid service personnel under subsection (b) within six months of being hired by a licensed establishment.Section 3. Section 474.1 heading, (a) and (g)(2) of the act, amended July 15, 2024 (P.L.700, No.57), are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 474.1. Surrender of Restaurant, Eating Place Retail Dispenser, Hotel, Club, Catering Club, Importing Distributor [and], Distributor, Hemp-Derived Cannabinoid Importing Distributor, Hemp-Derived Cannabinoid Distributor and Hemp-Derived Cannabinoid Retail License for Benefit of Licensee.--(a) A restaurant, eating place retail dispenser, hotel, club, catering club, importing distributor [and], distributor, hemp-derived cannabinoid importing distributor, hemp-derived cannabinoid distributor and hemp-derived cannabinoid retail licensee whose licensed establishment is not in operation for fifteen consecutive days shall return its license for safekeeping with the board no later than at the expiration of the fifteen-day period. The license may only be reissued from 20260HB2309PN3037 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 safekeeping in the manner set forth by the board through regulation. The regulation shall not differ from regulation outlining the reissuance of alcohol licenses from safekeeping.(a.1) The surrender and reissuance of the license holder's alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licenses may be conducted together, and if a license holder surrenders both the alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licenses, both licenses shall be maintained, stored and otherwise safeguarded together.* * *(g) * * *(2) [(Reserved).] If a licensee has a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license and an alcohol license in safekeeping with the board and they request, under paragraph (1), that the licenses remain in safekeeping for an additional year, the board shall only charge a fee for one license.Section 4. Sections 492(11) and 497 of the act are amended to read:Section 492. Unlawful Acts Relative to Malt or Brewed Beverages and Licensees.--It shall be unlawful--* * *(11) Delivery of Malt or Brewed Beverages With Other Commodities. For any manufacturer, importing distributor or distributor, or his servants, agents or employes, except with board approval, to deliver or transport any malt or brewed beverages in any vehicle in which any other commodity is being transported. The term "commodity" does not include hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.* * *20260HB2309PN3037 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 497. Liability of Licensees.--No licensee shall be liable to third persons on account of damages inflicted upon them off of the licensed premises by customers of the licensee unless the customer who inflicts the damages was sold, furnished or given liquor [or], malt or brewed beverages or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages by the said licensee or his agent, servant or employe when the said customer was visibly intoxicated.Section 5. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE IV-AHEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID BEVERAGESSection 401-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Business associate." A person that is a customer or supplier of goods or services to or for the benefit of a legitimate hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage business or licensed THC extractor or an officer or director, owner, operator, shareholder, member, employee, agent or financial backer of a legitimate hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage business or THC extractor."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Depository institution." As follows:(1) a depository institution as defined in section 3(c) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (64 Stat. 873, 12 U.S.C. § 1811 et seq.);(2) a Federal credit union as defined in section 101 of the Federal Credit Union Act (48 Stat. 1216, 12 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq.); or(3) a State credit union as defined in section 101 of 20260HB2309PN3037 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Federal Credit Union Act."Distributor." A person licensed by the board to engage in the purchase of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages only from Pennsylvania manufacturers of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and from importing distributors of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and the resale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, except to importing distributors and distributors."Federal financial regulatory agency." The Federal Reserve System, the United States Treasury, the Comptroller of the Currency, the National Credit Union Administration, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Securities and Exchange Commission and the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau."Financial institution." A depository institution, trust company, licensee, a person subject to the jurisdiction of a Federal financial regulatory agency or a person subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Banking and Securities under the act of December 5, 1972 (P.L.1280, No.284), known as the Pennsylvania Securities Act of 1972."Financial services."(1) A financial product or service:(i) as defined by section 1002 of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (Public Law 111-203, 12 U.S.C. § 5301 et seq.), regardless of whether the customer receiving the product or service is a consumer or a commercial entity; or(ii) permitted to be provided under the authority of:(A) a national bank or a financial subsidiary under 12 U.S.C. §§ 24 (42 Stat. 767), 24a (113 Stat. 1373) and 92a (76 Stat. 668);20260HB2309PN3037 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) a Federal credit union under the Federal Credit Union Act;(C) an incorporated institution under the act of November 30, 1965 (P.L.847, No.356), known as the Banking Code of 1965;(D) a credit union under 17 Pa.C.S. (relating to credit unions);(E) a person registered, or exempt from registration, to offer or sell a security or to act as a broker, dealer, transfer agency, clearing agency or investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (54 Stat. 789, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.);(F) a person registered, or exempt from registration, to:(I) offer or sell a security, under the Securities Act of 1933 (48 Stat. 74, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.);(II) act as an exchange, a broker, dealer, transfer agent or clearing agent under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (48 Stat. 881, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.);(III) act as an investment adviser under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (54 Stat. 847, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq.); or(IV) act as an investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940; or(G) a person acting as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser or investment adviser representative in this Commonwealth under the 20260HB2309PN3037 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania Securities Act of 1972.(2) The term includes a service, whether performed directly or indirectly, authorizing, processing, clearing, settling, billing, transferring for deposit, transmitting, delivering, instructing to be delivered, reconciling, collecting or otherwise effectuating or facilitating the payments of funds, where funds payments or funds are made or transferred by any means, including by the use of credit cards, debit cards or other access devices, accounts, original or substitute checks or electronic funds transfers."Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee." A person who holds a license under this article."Importing distributor." A person licensed by the board to engage in:(1) The purchase of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages from:(i) manufacturers of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages;(ii) other persons located outside this Commonwealth;(iii) persons licensed under this act as manufacturers of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages; and(iv) importing distributors of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(2) The resale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages."Insurance service." A service provided by an insurer in this Commonwealth."Insurer." An entity or person authorized by the Insurance Department to transact the business of insurance in this Commonwealth or designated as an eligible surplus lines insurer 20260HB2309PN3037 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as defined in section 1602 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921. The term includes a person licensed by the Insurance Department to sell, solicit or negotiate insurance, and that person's officers, directors, agents and employees."Manufacturer." A person, association or corporation engaged in the production or manufacturing of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in this Commonwealth or elsewhere."Principal display panel." As defined in 3 Pa.C.S. § 5722 (relating to definitions)."Trust company." The term includes:(1) a national bank authorized to exercise trust powers as authorized by 12 U.S.C. § 92a;(2) a trust company as defined by section 102 of the Banking Code of 1965; or(3) an interstate bank as defined in section 102 of the Banking Code of 1965 authorized to exercise the powers of a trust company in this Commonwealth.Section 402-A. Authority to issue hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licenses and THC extraction licenses.The board shall issue licenses regarding:(1) the sale, manufacture, importation, distribution, furnishing and transportation of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages; and(2) the extraction of THC from hemp and the manufacture, sale and transportation of emulsions, mixtures, concentrates or other products made from THC as provided for in this article.Section 403-A. THC extraction license.(a) Issuance.--The board shall issue to a resident of this 20260HB2309PN3037 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth of good repute who applies for, and pays the license fee prescribed, a THC extraction license to extract naturally occurring THC from hemp for use in hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(b) Production of beverages prohibited.--The granting of a THC extraction license to an applicant does not entitle the applicant to produce hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for sale to:(1) the general public; or(2) distributors for resale.(c) Sale to manufacturer.--The licensee may produce emulsions, mixes, concentrations or other products containing THC extracted from hemp for sale to and use by a licensed manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(d) Sales to nonlicensed persons prohibited.--The licensee shall not sell extractions, concentrations, mixes or other ingredients containing THC to a nonlicensed person in or outside of this Commonwealth, except that the licensee may sell products to persons outside of this Commonwealth who are licensed in their state, territory or country of origin.(e) THC extraction prohibited without license.--It shall be unlawful for a person who does not apply for, receive and hold a THC extraction license to extract THC from hemp and produce emulsions, mixtures, concentrations or other ingredients containing THC. A person who does not apply for, receive and hold a THC extraction license is not entitled to the exemptions and protections offered by section 431-A.(f) Requirements for licensure.--Requirements for and information furnished in the application for a THC extraction license shall mirror the requirements established in section 20260HB2309PN3037 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 410-A. An applicant who willfully furnishes false information in the application and review process for a THC extraction license shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to the penalties outlined in this article.(g) Regulations.--The board shall promulgate regulations as necessary to enforce this section.Section 404-A. Records to be maintained by holders of THC extraction license.(a) Maintenance of records.--A THC extraction licensee shall maintain, in addition to any other records required to be maintained by this article, a complete and truthful record of the licensee's operation that covers the preceding five-year period.(b) Records to be maintained.--The information and records to be maintained are as follows:(1) Dates of acquisition of raw hemp or other hemp products, the amount received and from whom the material was received.(2) Amount of THC extracted daily and what the THC was used for.(3) Amount/volume of emulsions, concentrations or other hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage ingredients produced from the material received under paragraph (1).(4) Sales of products produced from the material received under paragraph (1), including to whom the products were sold and how much was sold.(5) Method of delivery of the products sold and delivery manifests.(6) Test results of batches of emulsions, concentrations or other hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage ingredients that 20260HB2309PN3037 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attest to the THC content of the ingredients or seek to measure the number of contaminants in the ingredients, if the tests are performed.(c) Access to records.--The board, enforcement bureau and their authorized representatives shall have full access to the records outlined in this section. Records must be made available to the board, enforcement bureau or their authorized representatives within 72 hours of the request for access being made.(d) Regulations.--The board may promulgate regulations concerning how information in subsection (b) is to be recorded and may develop documents on which information is to be recorded.Section 405-A. Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license and eligible establishments.(a) Board authority.--The board may issue a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license to an eligible applicant and establishment. The license shall permit the holder to purchase hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and keep the beverages on the premises and to sell the hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to guests, patrons or members for consumption on the licensed establishment's premises and up to 192 fluid ounces for consumption off-premises.(b) Eligible establishments.--Eligible establishments for hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licenses shall include:(1) Restaurants, hotels and clubs.(2) Public venues, as defined by the board, with the following restrictions on sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages:(i) Sales may only be made one hour before, during 20260HB2309PN3037 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and one hour after an athletic performance, performing arts event, trade show, convention, banquet or any other performance at the facility.(ii) Sales may not be made from 2 a.m. to 7 a.m. Sales may not occur prior to 11 a.m. on Sunday.(3) Performing arts facilities, as defined by the board, with the following restrictions on sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages:(i) Sales may be made two hours before, during and one hour after a performance at the facility.(ii) Sales may not be made from 2 a.m. to 7 a.m. Sales may not occur prior to 10 a.m. or after 10 p.m. on Sunday.(4) Continuing care retirement communities, as defined by the board, with the following restrictions and privileges:(i) Sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages may not occur from 2 a.m. to 7 a.m. Sales may not occur prior to 1 p.m. or after 10 p.m. on Sunday.(ii) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages sold or furnished by the licensee may be possessed anywhere within the continuing care retirement community regardless of whether that portion of the premises is licensed. Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages sold or furnished by the licensee may not be taken beyond the confines of the continuing care retirement community.(iii) Sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages may occur in those portions of the premises licensed by the board as well as in rooms that are lived in or used by residents of the continuing care retirement community. Sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall be 20260HB2309PN3037 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 limited to residents of the continuing care retirement community and the guests of residents in conjunction with the normal, regularly scheduled dining, entertainment or social activities of the continuing care retirement community.(c) Catering licenses and temporary catering permits.--The board may issue hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering licenses and temporary hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering permits, subject to the following:(1) The holder of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering license or temporary hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering permit may engage in the sale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages at places besides the physical premises for which the license holder maintains a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license. Sales made under a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering license or temporary hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering permit shall be for immediate consumption on the catered premises only. A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering license shall only be issued to a holder of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail permit. There shall be no licensing prerequisite for obtaining a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering permit.(2) Notice of the catered events must be submitted to the board within seven days of the event taking place. The board may promulgate regulations that require additional information, as deemed necessary by the board, to be furnished regarding the catered event. The board may deny a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering license holder or temporary hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering permit 20260HB2309PN3037 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 holder the ability to engage in the sale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages at a catered event if the board deems that the sales will result in unlawful consumption, activity or sales.(3) A temporary hemp-derived cannabinoid catering permit may not have a date of expiration later than 30 days from the date of issue.(4) The same restrictions that exist for operations of and sales by hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license holders shall apply, as much as applicable as determined by the board, to a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering license holder or temporary hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering permit holder.Section 405.1-A. Sunday sales.(a) Authorization.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee whose license allows the sale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for consumption off-premises or on-premises may apply to the board for and receive a license allowing sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages from 9 a.m. on Sunday until 2 a.m. on Monday. The license allowing Sunday sales under this subsection shall be in addition to any license or permit issued under this act allowing the sale of alcohol on Sundays.(b) Fees.--(1) Each application under this section shall be accompanied by a $100 filing fee.(2) An annual renewal application of a license under this section shall be accompanied by a $100 renewal fee.(c) Action by board.--Upon receiving a proper application and fee under this section, the board shall issue or renew a 20260HB2309PN3037 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license unless the applicant is, or has in the preceding year, been out of compliance with the provisions of this article.(d) Appeal.--Section 424-A shall govern the appeal of an adverse action taken by the board under this section.Section 406-A. Application for hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license.(a) Application.--(1) An applicant for a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license or the transfer of an existing license to another premises not licensed or to another person shall file a written application with the board in the form and containing information that the board shall prescribe, which shall be accompanied by a filing fee and an annual license fee as prescribed in section 414-A.(2) The application must:(i) Contain a description of the part of the establishment for which the applicant desires a license.(ii) Specify other material information, descriptions or plans of that part of the establishment where it is proposed to keep and sell hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages as may be required by the regulations of the board.(3) The descriptions, information and plans in paragraph (2) must:(i) Show the establishment, or the proposed location for the construction of an establishment, at the time the application is made.(ii) Show alterations proposed to be made to the establishment or the new building proposed to be constructed after the approval by the board of the 20260HB2309PN3037 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application for a license or transfer of an existing license to another premises not licensed or to another person.(b) Physical alterations, improvements or changes to establishments.--(1) The board may not require physical alterations, improvements or changes to be made to an establishment or the construction of a new building for any purpose until approval of the application for license or transfer of an existing license to another premises not licensed or to another person.(2) (i) After approval of the application, the licensee shall make the physical alterations, improvements and changes to the licensed premises or shall construct the new building in the manner specified by the board at the time of approval.(ii) The licensee may not transact any business under the license until the board:(A) has approved the completed physical alterations, improvements and changes to the licensed premises or the completed construction of the new building as conforming to the specifications required by the board at the time of issuance or transfer of the license; and(B) is satisfied that the establishment is eligible for a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license under section 405-A.(3) The board may require that all alterations or construction or conformity to definition be completed within six months from the time of issuance or transfer of the 20260HB2309PN3037 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license. The time between the approval of the initial application and issuance of operating authority to the licensee shall be considered as time in safekeeping.(4) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall be considered cause for revocation of the license.(5) A license shall not be transferable between the time of issuance or transfer of the license and the approval of the completed alterations or construction by the board and full compliance by the licensee with the requirements of this article, unless the transfer application is accompanied by a surcharge, which shall be:(i) $15,000 for a license located in a county of the first class, county of the second class or county of the third class.(ii) $5,000 for a license located in a county not enumerated in subparagraph (i).(c) Conditions for applicants.--(1) If the applicant is an individual, the applicant must show that the individual is a citizen of the United States and a resident of this Commonwealth.(2) If the applicant is an association, the applicant must state the names and addresses of the persons constituting the association.(3) If the applicant is a corporation, the applicant must:(i) State the names and addresses of the principal officers of the corporation.(ii) Show that:(A) the corporation was created under the laws 20260HB2309PN3037 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this Commonwealth or holds a certificate of authority to transact business in this Commonwealth;(B) all officers, directors and stockholders of the corporation are citizens of the United States; and(C) the manager of the hotel, restaurant or club is a citizen of the United States.(4) A club applicant shall file as a part of the application a list of the names and addresses of the members, directors, officers, agents and employees of the club, together with the dates of their admission, election or employment and other information with respect to the club applicant's affairs as the board shall require.(5) An application must be signed and verified by oath or affirmation by any of the following persons, accompanied by written evidence of the person's authority to do so:(i) If the applicant is an individual, by the owner.(ii) If the applicant is an association, by a member or partner of the association.(iii) If the applicant is a corporation, by an executive officer of the corporation or a person specifically authorized by the corporation to sign the application.(6) The board shall refuse to issue a license to a club when it appears that the operation of the licensed business would inure to the benefit of individual members, officers, agents or employees of the club, rather than to the benefit of the entire membership of the club.(7) If a false statement is intentionally made in any part of the application, the affiant shall be deemed guilty 20260HB2309PN3037 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a misdemeanor and subject to the penalties outlined in this article.(d) Notice of application.--(1) An applicant for a new license or the transfer of an existing license shall post a notice of the application:(i) for a period of at least 30 days beginning with the day the application is filed with the board; and(ii) in a conspicuous place on the outside of the premises or at the proposed new location for which the license is applied.(2) The notice under paragraph (1) must be in the form and size and contain provisions that the board may require by regulation.(3) Proof of the posting of the notice under paragraph (1) shall be filed with the board.(4) The posting requirement imposed by this subsection shall not apply to license applications submitted for public venues.(e) Notification to municipality.--Upon receipt of an application for a new license or transfer of an existing license to a new location, the board shall immediately notify in writing the municipality in which the premises proposed to be licensed are located.Section 407-A. License hearings and license period.(a) Hearings.--(1) The board shall hold a hearing on an application for a new license or transfer of an existing license to a new location as the board deems necessary, at the time fixed for the purpose of hearing testimony.(2) The board shall hold a hearing on an application for 20260HB2309PN3037 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a new hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license or the transfer of a license to a new location, upon the request of a person with standing to testify under subsection (b) if the request is filed with the board no later than 15 days after posting of the notice of application under section 406-A(d).(3) The board may provide for the holding of hearings by hearing examiners learned in the law, to be appointed by the Governor, who shall not be subject to 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. III (relating to civil service reform). The hearing examiners shall make a report to the board in each case with recommendations.(4) The board may fix the license period for each separate license so that the expiration dates are staggered.(b) Right to testify.--A resident residing within a radius of 500 feet of the premises applying for a new hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license or the transfer of a license to a new location shall have standing to testify at a hearing held under subsection (a). The board and hearing examiner shall give appropriate evidentiary weight to testimony of the residents given at the hearing.(c) Construction.--This section shall not be construed to grant standing to residents residing within 500 feet of a public venue or performing arts facility.Section 408-A. Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license.(a) Issuance of license and operations generally.--The board shall issue to a reputable person who applies and pays the license fee prescribed in this article a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license for the place which the person desires to maintain for the sale of hemp-derived 20260HB2309PN3037 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabinoid beverages, not for consumption on the premises where sold, and in quantities of not less than a case or final container containing not less than 128 ounces which may be sold separately as prepared for the market by the manufacturer at the place of manufacture. A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license holder may sell hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in any amount to a person not licensed by the board for off-premises consumption. The sales shall not be required to be in the package configuration designated by the manufacturer.(b) Refusal of license.--The board may refuse to issue a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license to a person, corporation, partnership or association if the person, or officer or director of the corporation, or member or partner of the partnership or association has been convicted or found guilty of a felony within a period of five years immediately preceding the date of application for the license.(c) Licensing restrictions.--(1) The board may refuse to approve a new hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license or the transfer of a license to a new location if:(i) the location proposed to be licensed is within 300 feet of a church, hospital, charitable institution, school or public playground; or(ii) the new hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license or the transfer of a license to a new location is applied for a place within 200 feet of any other premises which is licensed by the board.(2) The board shall refuse an application for a new hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license or the transfer of a license to a new location if, in the 20260HB2309PN3037 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board's opinion, the new hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license or the transfer of a license to a new location would be detrimental to the welfare, health, peace and morals of the inhabitants of the neighborhood within a radius of 500 feet of the location proposed to be licensed.(3) The board may enter into an agreement with the applicant concerning additional restrictions on the license in question, subject to the following:(i) If the board and the applicant enter into an agreement, the agreement shall be binding on the applicant.(ii) Failure by the applicant to adhere to the agreement will be sufficient cause to form the basis for a citation under section 423-A and nonrenewal of the license.(iii) If the board enters into an agreement with an applicant concerning additional restrictions, the restrictions shall be binding on subsequent holders of the hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license until the license is transferred to a new location or until the board enters into a subsequent agreement removing the restrictions.(d) Notice required.--The board shall require notice to be posted on the property or premises upon which the applicant plans to engage in the sale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages. The notice shall be similar to the notice required of hemp-derived cannabinoid retail licensees.(e) Authority of license.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license authorizes the holder to sell or deliver hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in quantities 20260HB2309PN3037 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specified in this article anywhere within this Commonwealth that have been purchased only from persons licensed under this article as a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor.(f) Contracts.--(1) Distributors, importing distributors and manufacturers of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages may enter into contracts with one another in which both parties may:(i) form a mutual agreement regarding distribution of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in certain geographic areas; and(ii) place limits on distribution in certain geographic areas.(2) No other provisions of this act which may regulate the distribution of beverages or other products produced by licensees under this article based on geographic areas, distribution agreements, franchise agreements or any other analogous system shall apply to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's licenses.Section 409-A. Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor's license.(a) Duty of board.--The board shall issue a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor's license to a reputable person who applies for, and pays the license fee prescribed in this article, for the place that the person desires to maintain for the sale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, not for consumption on the premises where sold, and in quantities of not less than a case or final container containing at least 128 ounces which may be sold separately as prepared for the market by the manufacturer at the place of 20260HB2309PN3037 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufacture.(b) Decision making.--In the board's decision making on the issuing of a license under this article, section 408-A(b), (c) and (d) apply.(c) Scope of license.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor's license authorizes the holder to sell or deliver hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in quantities specified in this article anywhere within this Commonwealth that have been purchased from manufacturers or importing distributors licensed under this article, or from manufacturers and persons outside this Commonwealth engaged in the sale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, if the sales are legal under the laws of the state from which the beverages originate.(d) Authority of license holder.--The holder of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor's license shall be authorized to store and repackage hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages owned by a manufacturer at a segregated portion of a warehouse or other storage facility authorized by this article. The license holder shall be authorized to deliver, on behalf of the manufacturer, hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to other importing distributors. The license holder may collect a fee from the manufacturer for related storage, repackaging or delivery services.Section 410-A. Application for hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's and importing distributor's license.An application for a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license and a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor's license shall mirror the requirements in section 436(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i) and (j).20260HB2309PN3037 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 411-A. Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer's license.(a) Authority of board.--(1) The board shall issue a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer's license to a resident of this Commonwealth of good repute who applies for and pays the license fee prescribed in this article to produce and manufacture hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and to transport, sell and deliver hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages from the place of manufacture only in final containers, in quantities of not less than a case or in final containers of at least 128 ounces.(2) The application for a license shall be in the form and contain information as required by the board.(3) Licenses shall be granted for a license period to be determined by the board.(b) Records.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer's license holder shall keep at the principal place of business within this Commonwealth daily permanent records that include:(1) The quantities of raw materials and hemp-derived THC received and used in the manufacture of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and the quantities of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages manufactured and stored.(2) The sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(3) The quantities of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages stored for hire or transported for hire by or for the licensee.(4) The names and addresses of the purchasers or other recipients.20260HB2309PN3037 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Inspection of premises.--(1) A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer license holder's premises shall be subject to inspection by members of the board or persons authorized and designated by the board at any time as deemed necessary for the detection of violations of this article or rules and regulations of the board, or for the purpose of ascertaining the correctness of the records required to be kept by a licensee.(2) The books and records of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer license holder shall at all times be open to inspection by members of the board or persons authorized and designated by the board. Members of the board and persons authorized and designated by the board shall have the right, without hindrance, to enter any place subject to inspection under this article or any place where records are kept for the purpose of making inspections and making transcripts of inspections.(d) Out-of-State manufacturers.--A manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages located outside this Commonwealth may rent, lease or otherwise acquire space from an importing distributor or bailee for hire authorized by this article at no more than two locations per manufacturer for use of a segregated portion of a warehouse or other storage facility owned or operated by the importing distributor at which the out-of-State manufacturer may store, repackage and sell hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to an importing distributor or a purchaser outside this Commonwealth for delivery outside this Commonwealth, if the sale is legal in the state to which the beverages shall be delivered. The manufacturer may compensate the importing distributor or bailee for hire for related 20260HB2309PN3037 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 storage, repackaging or delivery services.(e) Storage licenses.--(1) The board shall issue to a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer license holder no more than five storage licenses per manufacturer to cover storage facilities separate from the location of the manufacturing facility.(2) A manufacturer may use the storage facilities to receive, store, repackage, sell and distribute hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in the same manner as at the manufacturer's place of manufacture or the manufacturer may rent, lease or otherwise acquire space from an importing distributor or bailee for hire authorized by this article in the same manner as an out-of-State manufacturer as specified in subsection (d).(3) A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer license holder shall file a separate written application to acquire storage licenses.(4) The board shall determine what information shall be provided on a storage license application.(5) Nothing in this article authorizing off-site storage facilities for a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer license holder is intended to make any change in the manner hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages are distributed through the three-tier system.(f) Sales to include food.--(1) A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer license holder under this section may sell, at the licensed place of manufacture, hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for consumption on premises to nonlicensees if food is also served and there are at least 10 seats for use by patrons.20260HB2309PN3037 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Food must consist of at least potato chips, pretzels and similar foods.(3) Food may be prepared by the licensee or by a third party.(g) Sales of beverages not produced by license holder.--(1) A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer license holder under this section may sell hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages not produced by the license holder if the sales do not constitute more than 50% of the on-premises sales of the manufacturer's hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for the preceding calendar year.(2) If a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer license holder did not operate for an entire calendar year during the preceding year, the license holder's combined sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages produced by another manufacturer may not, on a yearly basis, exceed 50% of the on-premises sales of the manufacturer's hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for that year.(h) Restaurant.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer license holder under this section may apply for and hold a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license for a restaurant to be opened at or attached to the premises for which they hold a manufacturer's license. The restaurant for which the hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license is held may exceed the 50% sales threshold established in subsection (f).Section 412-A. Application for hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer's license.(a) Application.--(1) An applicant for a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer's license shall file with the board a written 20260HB2309PN3037 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application in the form as the board shall require.(2) The application shall be accompanied by a filing fee of $100.(3) The application must include:(i) The legal names of the applicant and the owner of the place where business under the license will be carried on, along with the residence addresses by street and number of the following:(A) If the applicant is an individual, the individual.(B) If the applicant is a partnership, each partner.(C) If the applicant is a corporation, each officer of the corporation.(ii) All of the following:(A) The exact location of the place of business and of every place to be occupied or used in connection with the business.(B) The productive capacity of each plant where a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage is to be manufactured, produced, blended or developed.(C) The capacity of each warehouse or other place where the beverages are to be held or stored for hire or the equipment to be used where a transportation business is to be carried on under the license.(iii) Proof that the applicant is a citizen of the United States.(iv) Other relevant information that the board shall require by rule or regulation.20260HB2309PN3037 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Verification by affidavit.--An application must be verified by affidavit of the applicant made before an officer legally qualified to administer oaths. If a false statement is willfully made in any part of the application, the applicant shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to the penalties outlined in this article.Section 413-A. Expedited applications for holders of equivalent classes of alcohol licenses.(a) Duty of board.--The board shall promulgate regulations that establish a process by which applications for hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licenses that are submitted by an applicant who holds an alcohol license of an equivalent class may be expedited for review and final determination.(b) Regulations.--The regulations as promulgated by the board under subsection (a) shall apply to applications for alcohol licenses which are submitted by an applicant who holds a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license of an equivalent class.(c) Applicability.--Subsections (a) and (b) shall apply to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licenses and restaurant, hotel and club liquor licenses if the licenses have been first acquired through a transfer, auction or, in the case of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licenses, an initial offering under section 447-A.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow for lower approval standards in the board's review and final determination of expedited applications, or to prioritize holders of alcohol or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licenses over others in the auction process.Section 414-A. License fees.20260HB2309PN3037 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Fees.--The board shall charge fees for the following purposes and in the following amounts:(1) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licenses:(i) Application filing fee $700(ii) Renewal filing fee 30(iii) License fee:(A) Municipalities with a population of less than 1,500 250(B) Municipalities, except townships, with a population of 1,500 - 9,999 300(C) Municipalities, townships with a population of 1,500 - 11,999 300(D) Municipalities, except townships, with a population of 10,000 - 49,999 400(E) Municipalities, townships with a population of 12,000 - 49,999 400(F) Municipalities with a population of 50,000 - 99,999 500(G) Municipalities with a population of 100,000 - 149,999 600(H) Municipalities with a population of 150,000 or more 700(iv) Transfer fee:(A) Person to person 650(B) Place to place 550(C) Person to person and place to place transfer 700(2) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor:20260HB2309PN3037 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Application filing fee 700(ii) Renewal filing fee 30(iii) License fee 1,350(iv) Transfer fee:(A) Person to person transfer 650(B) Place to place 550(C) Person to person and place to place transfer 700(3) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor:(i) Application filing fee 700(ii) Renewal filing fee 30(iii) License fee 600(iv) Transfer fee:(A) Person to person 650(B) Place to place 550(C) Person to person and place to place transfer 700(4) THC extraction license:(i) Application filing fee 2,000(ii) Renewal filing fee 50(iii) License fee 1,800(iv) Transfer fee 800(5) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer:(i) Application filing fee 1,000(ii) Renewal filing fee 30(iii) License fee 1,500(iv) Transfer fee 800(6) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering 20260HB2309PN3037 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license:(i) Application filing fee 700(ii) Renewal filing fee 30(iii) License fee 250(iv) Transfer fee:(A) Person to person 650(B) Place to place 550(C) Person to person and place to place transfer 700(7) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering permit:(i) Application filing fee 300(ii) Renewal filing fee before expiration of previous permit 30(iii) License fee:(A) Less than 11 days 75(B) 11 - 30 days 150(b) Other fees.--A fee for a permit or license relating to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages that is not provided for in this section shall have the same fees assigned to it as assigned to its equivalent alcohol license or permit. The board shall determine equivalency.(c) Use of fees.--License fees authorized under this section shall be collected by the board for the use of the municipalities in which the fees were collected.(d) Returned checks.--(1) If a check issued in payment of a filing or license fee under this article is returned to the board as dishonored, the board shall charge a fee of $5 per $100, or a fractional part thereof, plus all protest fees, to the maker 20260HB2309PN3037 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the check submitted to the board.(2) Failure to make full payment or pay the face amount of the check in full and all charges as required in this section within 10 days after demand has been made by the board upon the maker of the check, or upon notification to the board by the Department of Revenue or the Department of Labor and Industry of an objection, the license of the person shall immediately become invalid and shall remain invalid until payment and all charges are received by the board.(e) Transfer.--If a license is transferred, no license or other fees shall be required from the persons to whom the transfer is made for the portion of the license period for which the license fee has been paid by the transferor, except for transfer fees provided in this section.Section 415-A. License renewals.(a) Time for filing.--An application for renewal of a license issued under this article shall be filed at least 60 days before the the expiration date of the license, along with any tax clearance that may be required by the board. The board may accept a renewal application filed less than 60 days before the expiration date of the license with the required fees, upon reasonable cause shown and the payment of an additional filing fee of $100 for late filing.(b) Final determination.--If a license renewal application is filed less than 60 days before the expiration date, or subsequent to the expiration date, a license shall not be issued upon the filing of the renewal application until the matter is finally determined by the board and, if an appeal is taken from the board's action, the courts shall not order the issuance of the renewal license until final determination of the matter by 20260HB2309PN3037 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the courts.(c) Agreements and additional restrictions.--(1) The board may enter into an agreement with the applicant concerning additional restrictions on the license or permit in question.(2) If the board and the applicant enter into an agreement, the agreement shall be binding on the applicant.(3) Failure by the applicant to adhere to the agreement will be sufficient cause to form the basis for a citation under section 423-A and for nonrenewal of the license under this section.(d) Catering permit renewal.--An application for renewal of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering permit shall be filed at least:(1) one day prior to expiration if the permit is valid for less than 11 days; or(2) five days prior to expiration if the permit is valid for less than 31 days.(e) License renewal.--(1) A license renewal application will not be considered filed unless accompanied by the requisite filing and license fees and any additional filing fee required by this section.(2) The license of a licensee shall be renewed unless:(i) the board gave 10 days' previous notice to the applicant of objections to the renewal of the license based upon violation by the licensee or the licensee's servants, agents or employees of any of the laws of this Commonwealth or regulations of the board relating to the manufacture, transportation, use, storage, importation, possession or sale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages;20260HB2309PN3037 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) the conduct of a licensed establishment is deemed in violation of this article;(iii) the applicant has by the applicant's own act become a person of ill repute; or(iv) the premises do not meet the requirements of this article or the regulations of the board.(3) A noise violation shall not be the sole basis for objection by the board to the renewal of a license unless the licensee has received three prior adjudicated noise citations within a 24-month period.(f) Fees.--A renewal of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering permit will not be considered filed unless accompanied by the requisite filing and license fees and any additional filing fee required by this section. The board may decline to renew a catering permit without cause.Section 416-A. License to be displayed.(a) License displayed.--(1) A license issued under this article shall be constantly and conspicuously displayed under transparent substance on the licensed premises.(2) A license shall not authorize sales until the licensee complies with this section.(b) Permit displayed.--A permit issued under this article shall be constantly and conspicuously displayed adjacent to the area of the catered premise that is serving hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages. A permit may not authorize sales or furnishment of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages until the permit holder complies with this section.Section 417-A. Premises and records subject to inspections.The premises of a license or permit holder where THC is 20260HB2309PN3037 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 extracted from hemp or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage covered by the license is manufactured, produced, developed, stored for hire or in connection with a licensee's business shall be subject to inspection by members of the board or by persons duly authorized and designated by the board at any time as they may deem necessary for:(1) the detection of violations of this article or of the rules and regulations of the board promulgated under the authority of this article; or(2) the purpose of ascertaining the correctness of the records required by this article to be kept by licensees and the books and records of licensees, and the books and records of their customers as they relate to purchases from the licensees, shall at all times be open to inspection by the members of the board or by persons duly authorized and designated by the board for the purpose of making inspections as authorized by this section. Members of the board and the persons duly authorized and designated by the board shall have the right, without fee or hindrance, to enter any place which is subject to inspection under this section, or any place where records subject to inspection under this article are kept, for the purpose of making inspections.Section 418-A. Number and kinds of licensees allowed same licensee.(a) Number of licenses allowed.--(1) A person shall not possess or be issued more than one hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor's license.(2) A person may possess both a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor's license and a distributor's license.20260HB2309PN3037 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A person may possess both a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor's license and an importing distributor's license.(4) A person may possess both a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer's license and a THC extraction license.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Distributor." As defined in section 102."Importing distributor." As defined in section 102.Section 419-A. Records to be kept.(a) Complete and truthful records.--A person holding a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license, hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor license or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor license issued under this article shall keep complete and truthful daily records covering the operation of the licensed business, particularly showing the date of all purchases of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, the actual price paid and the name of the vendor.(b) Time frame.--The records under this section must cover at least the most recent two-year period.(c) Maintenance location.--(1) The records under this section from the most recent six-month period must be maintained on the licensed premises.(2) The records under this section for the remainder of the two-year period may be kept off the licensed premises if the records are returned to the licensed premises within 24 hours of a request by the board or enforcement bureau.(d) Removal of records.--A licensee may remove the records for the most recent six-month period from the licensed premises 20260HB2309PN3037 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 only for a lawful business purpose provided that they are returned to the premises when that business is completed.Section 420-A. Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensees restrictions on sales and storage.(a) Applicable law.--(1) Except as otherwise provided by this article, the restrictions under section 406 that apply to the places, days and times for sales by liquor licensees shall apply to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages retail licensees.(2) The board may prescribe other conditions relating to the places, days and times for the sale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, consistent with this article. In prescribing other conditions, the board shall transmit notice of the changes to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The changes shall take effect upon the publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(3) This section shall not be construed to expand the type of eligible establishment that may apply for and hold a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license as provided for in section 405-A.(4) A license or permit authorizing sales on Sunday in the context of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall be governed by section 405.1-A.(b) Restrictions.--Restrictions for distributors and importing distributors are as follows:(1) A distributor or importing distributor shall not purchase, receive or resell hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages except:(i) in the original containers as prepared for the 20260HB2309PN3037 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 market by the manufacturer at the place of manufacture or in the original cases as received by the manufacturer; or(ii) in the case of identical containers repackaged in the manner described in this section.(2) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages sold or delivered shall not be consumed upon the premises of the distributor or importing distributor.(3) A distributor or importing distributor shall not maintain or operate any place where sales are made other than that for which the license is granted.(4) To salvage one or more salable cases from one or more damaged cases, cartons or packages of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, a distributor or importing distributor may repackage consequent to inadvertent damage and sell a case, carton or package of identical units of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages. Repackaging is permissible only to the extent made necessary by inadvertent damage. Repackaging not consequent to damage is prohibited. As used in this paragraph, the term "identical units" means undamaged bottles or cans of identical brand, package and volume.(5) All hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages purchased by an importing distributor from a Pennsylvania manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or from a person located outside this Commonwealth for resale shall be invoiced to the importing distributor, come physically into the possession of the importing distributor and be unloaded into and distributed from the licensed premises of the importing distributor. The board may act to further define and control the storage and distribution of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in conformity with this section and this article.20260HB2309PN3037 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) A distributor or importing distributor may not be required to collect the name, address or any other identifying information of a private individual for the purpose of keeping a record of the quantity of cases or volume of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages purchased.Section 421-A. Unlawful acts relative to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.The following acts are unlawful:(1) Sales of cannabinoid beverages. A person or employee or agent of a person may not keep for sale, or directly or indirectly, or upon any pretense or upon any device, sell or offer to sell a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage within this Commonwealth, except in accordance with this article and the regulations of the board. A person found to be in violation is subject to section 422-A(a) in addition to any other provision of law.(2) Importation or delivery into the Commonwealth. A person may not transport into this Commonwealth hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages from another state, territory, foreign country or insular possession of the United States for any reason. This paragraph shall not apply to a person with a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importer's license issued by the board.(3) Purchase of cannabinoid beverages. A person may not purchase or attempt to purchase, barter, trade or otherwise exchange something of value, perceived or tangible, for hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages from any person or source other than those licensed under this article or regulations of the board.(4) Sales by hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail 20260HB2309PN3037 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensees. A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licensee and the licensee's servants, agents or employees may not sell any hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for consumption on the licensed premises except in a room or rooms or place on the licensed premises at all times accessible to the use and accommodation of the general public. This section shall not be interpreted to prohibit a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licensee from providing private affairs, the primary function of which is for catering only to weddings or special occasions arranged 24 hours in advance, nor to prohibit a restaurant that holds a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license that is located in a hotel from selling hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in any room of the hotel occupied by a bona fide guest.(5) Sales by manufacturers. A manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages may not sell or offer for sale hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to any person for any reason except in accordance with this article and regulations of the board.(6) Manufacturing without license. A person may not manufacture hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages unless the person holds a valid hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer's license issued by the board.(7) Transportation of cannabinoid beverages. A person may not transport hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages except in the original containers. A person may not transport hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for another person who is engaged in selling hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages unless the person holds a license to transport for hire alcohol, 20260HB2309PN3037 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 liquor and malt and brewed beverages or a permit issued by the board. This paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit transportation of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages through this Commonwealth and not for delivery in this Commonwealth if the transporting is done in accordance with the rules and regulations of the board.(8) Transportation by licensee. A licensee shall deliver or transport hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in a vehicle bearing the name and address and license number of the licensee painted or affixed on each side of the vehicle in letters no smaller than two inches in height.(9) Selling to persons doing illegal business. A licensee or the licensee's servants, agents or employees, shall not knowingly sell hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to a person engaged in the business of illegally selling hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(10) Coercing distributors and importing distributors. A manufacturer or an officer, agent or representative of a manufacturer shall not coerce or persuade or attempt to coerce or persuade a licensee to:(i) sell or distribute hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages wholesale or retail;(ii) establish selling prices for the products;(iii) enter into any contracts or agreements, whether written or oral; or(iv) take any action which will violate this article or any of the rules or regulations promulgated by the board under this article.(11) Furnishing cannabinoid beverages to certain persons. A licensee or an employee, servant or agent of the 20260HB2309PN3037 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensee shall not sell, furnish or give hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or to permit hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to be sold, furnished or given to a visibly intoxicated person or to a minor.(12) Failure to have records on premises. A licensee shall properly maintain records as required under this article or by regulation of the board.(13) Employment of minors. The following shall apply:(i) A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licensee shall not employ or permit a minor under 18 years of age to serve any hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or employ or permit a minor under 16 years of age to render any service in the licensed premises, nor shall any entertainer under the age of 18 be employed or permitted to perform in a licensed premises in violation of the labor laws of this Commonwealth.(ii) In accordance with board regulations, minors between 16 and 18 years of age may be employed to serve food, clear tables and perform other similar duties, not including the dispensing or serving of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(iii) A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licensee may allow students receiving instruction in a performing art to perform an exhibition if the students are not compensated and are under proper supervision. Written notice of the performance must be provided to the enforcement bureau prior to the performance.(14) Refusing the right of inspection. A licensee under this article, or the licensee's servants, agents or employees, shall not refuse the board or the enforcement 20260HB2309PN3037 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bureau or any of their authorized employees the right to inspect the entire licensed premises at any time during which the premises are open for the transaction of business, or when patrons, guests or members are in that portion of the licensed premises where hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages are sold.(15) Consumption of cannabinoid beverages while tending bar. A licensee or the licensee's servants, agents or employees shall not consume hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages while tending bar or otherwise serving hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages. No action shall be taken against a licensee under this paragraph unless the licensee is the individual consuming hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(16) Permitting undesirable persons or minors to frequent premises. The following shall apply:(i) A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licensee or the licensee's servants, agents or employees shall not permit persons of ill repute or prostitutes to frequent the licensed premises or any premises operated in connection with this article.(ii) Minors may only frequent a licensed premises if:(A) they are accompanied by a parent;(B) they are accompanied by a legal guardian;(C) they are under proper supervision;(D) they are attending a social gathering; or(E) the hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licensee has gross sales of food and nonalcoholic beverages equal to 50% or more of the licensee's combined gross sale of both food and alcoholic 20260HB2309PN3037 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 beverages.(iii) If a minor is frequenting a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licensee under subparagraph (ii)(E), the minor may not sit at the bar section of the premises, nor may any hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages be served at the table or booth at which the minor is seated unless the minor is with a parent or legal guardian or under proper supervision.(iv) If a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licensee is hosting a social gathering under subparagraph (ii)(D), written notice at least 48 hours in advance of the gathering shall be given to the Bureau of Enforcement.(v) If a minor is frequenting licensed premises with proper supervision under subparagraph (ii)(C), each supervisor can supervise up to 20 minors, except for premises located in cities of the first class, where each supervisor can supervise up to five minors.(vi) If a minor is on the premises as part of a school-endorsed function, each supervisor can supervise 50 minors. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to make it unlawful for minors to frequent public venues and performing arts facilities.(17) Furnishing or delivering hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages at unlawful hours. A licensee or the licensee's servants, agents or employees shall not give, furnish, trade, barter, serve or deliver hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to any person during hours or on days when the licensee is prohibited by this article from serving hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.20260HB2309PN3037 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (18) Use of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages while underage. An individual under 21 years of age shall not attempt to purchase, purchase, consume, possess or knowingly and intentionally transport hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages. A person who violates this paragraph shall be subject to the penalty prescribed in section 422-A(c).Section 422-A. Penalties.(a) Misdemeanor.--A person convicted of a violation of this article that is graded as a misdemeanor shall be sentenced as follows:(1) For a first offense, to pay a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500 and, upon failure to pay the fine, to imprisonment for a period of not less than one month, nor more than three months.(2) For a second or subsequent offense, to pay a fine of not less than $300 nor more than $500, or to imprisonment for a period of not less than three months nor more than one year, or both.(b) Unlicensed sales.--A person convicted of selling or offering to sell a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage without being licensed is in violation of this article and shall, in addition to any other penalty described by law, be sentenced to pay a fine of $10 per fluid ounce for each container of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage found on the premises where the sale was made or attempted. The following apply:(1) The amount of fine per container will be based upon the capacity of the container when full, whether or not the container is full at the time of the attempted sale.(2) All hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall be confiscated.20260HB2309PN3037 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) If a person fails to pay the full amount of the fine levied under this subsection, the premises on which the hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage was found shall be subject to a lien in the amount of the unpaid fine if the premises are owned by the person against whom the fine was levied or by any other person who had knowledge of the proscribed activity. The lien shall be superior to any other liens on the premises other than a duly recorded mortgage.(c) Summary offense.--A violation of section 421-A(18) is a summary offense. A person convicted of a violation may be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $500 for the first violation and not more than $1,000 for the second and each subsequent violation. The following shall apply:(1) When a person is charged with violating section 421-A(18), the magisterial district judge may admit the offender to the adjudication alternative as authorized in 42 Pa.C.S. § 1520 (relating to adjudication alternative program) or any other preadjudication disposition if the offender has not previously received a preadjudication disposition for violating section 421-A(18).(2) The use of a preadjudication disposition shall be considered a first or subsequent offense, whichever is applicable, for the purpose of further adjudication of violations of section 421-A(18).(d) Suspension and revocation.--The right to suspend and revoke licenses granted under this article shall be in addition to the penalty specified in this section.Section 423-A. Revocation and suspension of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licenses.(a) Notice.--Upon learning of a violation of this article, 20260HB2309PN3037 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any regulations of the board or any laws of this Commonwealth relating to the payment of taxes on hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages by a licensee or the licensee's officers, servants, agents or employees, or upon any other sufficient cause shown, the enforcement bureau may, within one year from the date of the violation or cause appearing, cite the licensee to appear before an administrative law judge, not less than 10 nor more than 60 days from the date of sending the licensee, by registered mail, a notice addressed to the licensee at the licensed premises, to show cause why the license should not be suspended or revoked or a fine imposed, or both. The bureau shall send a copy of the hearing notice to the municipality in which the premises is located.(b) Hearing.--(1) A hearing on the citation shall be held in the same manner as provided in section 407-A for hearings on applications for license.(2) If, as a result of the hearing, the administrative law judge is satisfied that a violation has occurred or for other sufficient cause, the administrative law judge shall immediately suspend or revoke the license or impose a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $1,000, or both.(3) The administrative law judge shall notify the licensee of the decision resulting from the hearing by registered letter addressed to the licensee's licensed premises.(c) Violations.--If a licensee has been cited and found to have violated section 421-A(11), (14), (16) or (17), or if the owner or operator of the licensed premises or an authorized agent of the owner or operator has been convicted of a violation 20260HB2309PN3037 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act or 18 Pa.C.S. § 5902 (relating to prostitution and related offenses) or 6301 (relating to corruption of minors), the administrative law judge shall immediately suspend or revoke the license or impose a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000, or both.(d) Partial compliance.--If a licensee has been cited and found to have violated section 421-A(11) but at the time of the sale the licensee was in compliance with the requirements specified in section 471.1 and the licensee had not sold to minors or visibly intoxicated persons in the previous four years, the administrative law judge shall immediately suspend or revoke the license or impose a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $1,000, or both.(e) Notification and time limit for payment.--The administrative law judge shall notify the licensee by registered mail, addressed to the licensed premises, of the suspension, revocation or fine. If the fine is not paid within 20 days of the adjudication, the administrative law judge shall suspend or revoke the license and notify the licensee by registered mail addressed to the licensed premises.(f) Effect of suspensions and revocations.--Suspensions and revocations shall not go into effect until 30 days after the date of the adjudication during which time the licensee may take an appeal as provided for in section 424-A.(g) Time for ineligibility.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee whose license is revoked shall be ineligible for a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license or alcohol license under this article until the expiration of three years 20260HB2309PN3037 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 from the date the license was revoked.(h) Other license affected.--If a licensee holds both a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license and an alcohol license, and either license is revoked or suspended, the other license shall also be revoked or suspended.(i) No fines or penalties.--A license that is suspended or revoked solely on the basis of a separate license's revocation or suspension in accordance with subsection (h) shall not be subject to fines or other monetary penalties.(j) Time limit for license or transfer.--If a license is revoked, a license shall not be granted for the premises or transferred to the premises in which the license was conducted for a period of at least one year after the date of the revocation of the license conducted at the premises, except in cases where the licensee or a member of the licensee's immediate family is not the owner of the premises, in which case the board may issue or transfer a license within the year.(k) Prior citation history.--The administrative law judge may consider the licensee's prior citation history when imposing a penalty. If the violation in question is a third or subsequent violation of an offense referred to in subsection (b) or 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) occurring within a period of four years, the administrative law judge shall impose a suspension or revocation. Violations related both to alcohol licenses and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licenses may be counted together.(l) Responsible alcohol management.--If a licensee has been cited and found to have violated section 421-A(11) regarding sales to minors or visibly intoxicated person, the administrative law judge shall require the licensee to comply 20260HB2309PN3037 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with the requirements specified in section 471.1 pertaining to responsible alcohol management.(m) Nonpayment of fines.--If the fine is not paid within 20 days of the adjudication, the administrative law judge shall suspend or revoke the license, and notify the licensee by registered mail addressed to the licensed premises.Section 424-A. Appeals for revocation or suspension of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license.(a) Appeal to board.--If the bureau or person who was fined or whose license was suspended or revoked feels aggrieved by the adjudication of the administrative law judge, there shall be a right to appeal to the board. The appeal shall be based solely on the record before the administrative law judge. The board shall only reverse the decision of the administrative law judge if the administrative law judge committed an error of law, abused the administrative law judge's discretion or if the decision is not based on substantial evidence.(b) Appeal to court of common pleas.--If the bureau or person who was fined or whose license was suspended or revoked feels aggrieved by the decision of the board, there shall be a right to appeal to the court of common pleas in the same manner as provided for appeals from refusals to grant licenses in section 464, except that the court of common pleas shall base its decision on the administrative record and may not conduct a de novo hearing as to questions of fact, administrative discretion and other matters involved.(c) Supersedeas.--An appeal shall act as a supersedeas unless, upon sufficient cause shown, the reviewing authority shall determine otherwise. If the licensee has been cited and found to have violated section 421-A(11), (14), (16) or (17), or 20260HB2309PN3037 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if the owner or operator of the licensed premises or an authorized agent of the owner or operator has been convicted of a violation of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or 18 Pa.C.S. § 5902 (relating to prostitution and related offenses) or 6301 (relating to corruption of minors), the licensee's appeal shall not act as a supersedeas unless the reviewing authority determines otherwise upon sufficient cause shown.(d) Consideration of authority.--In a hearing on an application for a supersedeas under this section, the reviewing authority may consider, in addition to other relevant evidence, documentary evidence, including records of the bureau, showing the prior history of citations, fines, suspensions or revocations against the licensee. The reviewing authority may also consider, in addition to other relevant evidence, evidence of any recurrence of the unlawful activity occurring between the date of the citation which is the subject of the appeal and the date of the hearing. If the reviewing authority is the board, no hearing shall be held on the application for a supersedeas, but a decision shall be made based on the application, answer and documentary evidence under this subsection.Section 425-A. Hearings upon refusal of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license renewal or transfer and appeals.If an applicant for a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage license or THC extraction license has the application or request for license denied, the applicant is entitled to a hearing and an appeal. The hearings and appeals process shall mirror the process outlined in section 464.20260HB2309PN3037 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 426-A. Transportation of hemp-derived beverages.(a) License required.--A person who transports hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for another who is engaged in selling hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall hold a license to transport for hire alcohol, liquor and malt or brewed beverages.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed as to prevent the transportation of malt or brewed beverages together with hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.Section 427-A. Imposition of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage tax.(a) Tax authorized.--There is imposed upon each purchase at retail of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages a tax of 12% of the purchase price to be collected from the purchaser by the seller of the beverage.(b) Disposition of tax.--The amount collected under subsection (a) shall be transmitted quarterly to the board by the collector of the tax. The board shall pay the money collected, along with money collected by the board under subsection (a), into the State Treasury and 20% of the total shall be transferred to the Local Hemp Sharing Fund. The remainder shall be transferred to the General Fund.(c) Receipt and tracking system.--The board shall promulgate regulations that provide for an appropriate receipt and tracking system to be utilized by all sellers of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages subject to the collection of the tax that provides the municipality of origin from which the tax money paid originate from.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20260HB2309PN3037 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Purchase at retail."(1) Purchases made by a person for any reason from a licensed hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor, licensed hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor or Pennsylvania Liquor Store.(2) The term includes purchases made by a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license holder from a licensed hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturer.(3) The term does not include:(i) Purchases made by a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage distributor, hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor, or Pennsylvania Liquor Store from a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage importing distributor.(ii) Purchases made by a person from a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license holder for consumption on premises.Section 428-A. Exemption from sales tax.Sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages from a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license holder to a person for consumption on premises is exempt from the sales and use tax imposed in section 202 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 429-A. Establishment of and disbursements from Local Hemp Sharing Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Local Hemp Sharing Fund is established within the State Treasury. Money in the Local Hemp Sharing Fund shall be appropriated on a continuing basis for the purposes described under this section.(b) Assessment by department.--The department shall annually 20260HB2309PN3037 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assess the total amount of revenue raised by the tax imposed in section 427-A and determine the amount received from each municipality who has, in their jurisdiction, a vendor or manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages that has collected the tax.(c) Disbursement.--The department shall disburse, on an annual basis, to each municipality who has, in their jurisdiction, a vendor or manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages that has collected the tax under section 427-A in the preceding calendar year a portion equal to 10% of the total tax received from vendors and manufacturers of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages located in the municipality.Section 430-A. THC not to be considered adulterant.THC that is derived solely and exclusively from hemp and used in food and beverage preparations that are manufactured, sold, transported or otherwise used in compliance with this article shall not be considered by the Commonwealth or any of its agencies to be an adulterant or poison or have any other designation attached to the THC that would render it unfit or unsafe for use in beverages and food meant for human consumption.Section 431-A. Exemption from existing law.(a) Exemption from The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.--Hemp, THC exclusively and solely derived from hemp or mixtures, preparations and beverages containing THC that are exclusively and solely derived from hemp that are used in compliance with this article or were lawfully manufactured under this article or lawfully manufactured in the jurisdiction of another state shall not be subject to the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, 20260HB2309PN3037 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Device and Cosmetic Act, or be subject to any other laws of this Commonwealth, outside of this article, that would otherwise prohibit the use, possession, sale, transport or manufacture of hemp, beverages, mixtures or preparations on account of the hemp, beverages, mixtures or preparations containing THC.(b) Regulations.--The board shall promulgate regulations that determine the actions that may be taken if a licensee has its license revoked, suspended or otherwise removed, and the former licensee still has in its possession hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, hemp, hemp-derived THC mixtures, emulsions, concentrate or any other hemp-derived product containing THC. The regulations shall include a reasonable period of time for the former license holder to responsibly dispose of the remaining stock. Sale, barter, trade, donation or any other transfer of remaining stock, whether or not for monetary gain, shall not be considered a method of responsible disposal.(c) Exemption for former license holder.--A former license holder who is in compliance with the rules promulgated by the board under subsection (b) may not be criminally charged or otherwise subject to The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act or any other laws of this Commonwealth that would otherwise prohibit the use, possession, sale, transport or manufacture of the beverages on account of the beverages containing THC, in relation to any remaining stock of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, hemp, hemp-derived THC mixtures, emulsions, concentrate or any other hemp-derived product containing THC that the former license holder has in their possession.(d) Rules and regulations.--The board shall promulgate rules 20260HB2309PN3037 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and regulations as necessary to protect licensees, former licensees and applicants who are acting in good faith to comply with this article from criminal or civil penalties that would be levied by The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act or any other laws of this Commonwealth that would otherwise prohibit the use, possession, sale, transport or manufacture of hemp, THC or mixtures and preparations containing THC in relation to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, or ingredients containing THC used in the manufacture of the products that the license holder or former license holder may have in their possession.(e) Violation by minor.--An individual under 21 years of age who attempts to purchase, purchases, consumes, possesses or knowingly and intentionally transports a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage shall not be subject to The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act in relation to the attempted purchase, purchase, consumption, possession or transportation of the hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages. The individual shall only be subject to section 422-A(c) with regard to the actions.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt an individual under the influence of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages from 75 Pa.C.S. § 3735.1 (relating to aggravated assault by vehicle while driving under the influence), 3802 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance), 3803 (relating to grading), 3804 (relating to penalties) or 7726 (relating to operation in safe manner). For the purposes of those sections only, hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages, THC derived solely and exclusively from hemp or a product made from the THC shall be considered a 20260HB2309PN3037 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 controlled substance.Section 432-A. Federal cooperation prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--A government official, government employee, law enforcement officer, law enforcement agency or government agency that has jurisdiction anywhere in this Commonwealth shall not provide information, funding, material support or any other assistance to Federal law enforcement, Federal Government agencies, or other Federal bodies as it relates to investigations and civil or criminal actions against a person licensed under this article who is alleged to have violated Federal laws or regulations related to hemp or THC.(b) Investigations and actions.--The prohibition in subsection (a) shall also apply to Federal investigations and civil or criminal actions against a person who consumes, possesses, transports, purchases or attempts to purchase hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages lawfully manufactured under this article or lawfully manufactured in the jurisdiction of another state.(c) Nonapplicability.--The prohibition in subsection (a) does not apply to investigations and civil or criminal actions concerning THC that is not derived solely and exclusively from hemp, products made from THC that is not derived solely and exclusively from hemp or marijuana as defined by section 2 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or section 102 of the Controlled Substances Act (Public Law 91-513, 84 Stat. 1236).Section 433-A. Financial and insurance services to licensees.(a) Financial services.--A financial institution authorized to engage in business in this Commonwealth may provide financial 20260HB2309PN3037 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services to or for the benefit of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee and the business associates of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee, subject to:(1) The laws and regulations applicable to the provision of financial services to other customers of the financial institution.(2) Applicable consumer protection laws of this Commonwealth.(3) Additional requirements applicable to the institution established for the provision of services to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensees or their business associates by the Department of Banking and Securities or a financial regulatory agency of the state under which the institution is organized.(4) The extent the institution is providing services to a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or their business associates in another jurisdiction, additional requirements applicable to the institution established for the provision of the services by a financial regulatory agency of that jurisdiction.(b) Insurance services.--An insurer may provide insurance services to or for the benefit of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or their business associates, subject to:(1) The laws and regulations applicable to the provision of insurance services to other customers of the insurer.(2) Applicable consumer protection laws of this Commonwealth.(3) Additional requirements applicable to the insurer established for the provision of services to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensees or their business associates 20260HB2309PN3037 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the Insurance Department.(4) The extent the insurer is providing services to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensees or their business associates in another jurisdiction, additional requirements applicable to the insurer established for the provision of the services by an insurance regulatory agency of that jurisdiction.(c) No requirement.--Nothing in this article shall require a depository institution, an entity performing a financial service for or in association with a financial institution or an insurer to provide financial or insurance services to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensees or the business associates of the licensees or to any other business.Section 434-A. Protections for financial institutions and insurers.(a) Restrictions.--An agency or political subdivision of this Commonwealth may not:(1) Prohibit, penalize or otherwise discourage a financial institution or insurer from providing financial or insurance services to a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or their business associates.(2) Recommend, incentivize or encourage a financial institution or insurer not to offer financial or insurance services to an account holder, or downgrade or cancel services provided to the account holder, solely because the account holder is a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or a business associate of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee.(3) Take adverse or corrective supervisory action on a loan made to a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or 20260HB2309PN3037 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a business associate of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee solely because the loan has been made to a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or a business associate of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee.(4) Prohibit or penalize a financial institution or insurer performing financial or insurance services in association with another financial institution or insurer from providing financial or insurance services to a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or a business associate of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee.(5) Subject the legal interest of a financial institution in the collateral for a loan or another financial service provided to a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or the business associates of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee to civil or criminal forfeiture under any laws of this Commonwealth or initiate or participate in proceedings for the civil or criminal forfeiture of a legal interest under Federal law or under the laws of another state.(b) Enforcement actions.--Nothing in this article shall prevent the Department of Banking and Securities, the Insurance Department or the Attorney General, in a manner consistent with the requirements of section 506 of the act of May 15, 1933 (P.L.565, No.111), known as the Department of Banking and Securities Code, from undertaking an enforcement action for compliance with section 433-A(a) and (b) in a manner consistent with subsection (a).(c) Not subject to criminal prosecution, sanction or claim.--Subject to subsection (g), a financial institution or insurer, or the directors, officers, employees, agents, owners, 20260HB2309PN3037 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shareholders or members of a financial institution or insurer, shall not be subject to criminal prosecution, sanction or claim for damages or any equitable remedy, solely because the institution or insurer is providing financial or insurance services to or for the benefit of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or the business associates of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee.(d) Proceeds.--The proceeds of a transaction involving the activities of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee may not be considered proceeds from an unlawful activity solely because the transaction involves the proceeds from a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or a business associate of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee.(e) Rights and privileges.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee, or a business associate of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee, shall not be denied a right or privilege by a State agency solely because of the licensee's or business associate's status as a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or business associate of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee.(f) Failure to provide notice.--If a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee fails to provide the notice required under subsection (h) to a financial institution or insurer, the financial institution or insurer shall not be deemed in violation of this chapter solely because the financial institution or insurer was not notified and continued to provide services beyond the date when the services should have been terminated as a result of the suspension or revocation of the license or permit.(g) Compliance.--The protections provided by this section to 20260HB2309PN3037 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a financial institution or insurer and to the directors, officers, employees, agents, owners, shareholders or members of the institution or insurer are subject to the institution's or insurer's material compliance with the requirements of section 433-A(a) and (b) and reasonable due diligence to determine that a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee or a business associate of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee is in compliance with the laws of this Commonwealth and the laws of other states in which the hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee is located that provide authorization for the operation of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage businesses.(h) Notice.--If a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee obtains financial or insurance services from a financial institution or insurer doing business in this Commonwealth, the licensee shall, within five business days, provide notice to the financial institution or insurer if a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage related license or permit held by the licensee or their affiliates under the laws of this Commonwealth or a law established by another state is suspended or revoked.(i) Policy and regulations.--The Department of Banking and Securities and the Insurance Department may adopt statements of policy or regulations to implement this section and section 433-A and provide further protection and guidance for financial institutions and insurers providing financial or insurance services to a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee and business associates of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage licensee.Section 435-A. Food and beverage facility oversight.(a) Duty of department.--The Department of Agriculture, in accordance with 3 Pa.C.S. (relating to agriculture), shall have 20260HB2309PN3037 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 oversight and inspection authority with regard to food safety of a facility that manufactures, packages, stores or transports hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or any other food ingredient, hemp product, hemp byproduct or THC product that is used in the manufacture, mixing, blending or other creation of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages. The Department of Agriculture shall promulgate food safety rules and regulations that provide for the safe handling, storage, mixing and other activities related to the manufacture of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(b) Inspection.--A person licensed under this article to manufacture or produce hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or related ingredients may not manufacture or produce hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or related ingredients before passing a facility inspection by the Department of Agriculture with regard to food safety standards and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage manufacturing standards.(c) Authority of board.--The board shall have inspection and oversight authority of a facility that manufactures, packages, stores or transports hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or any other food ingredient, hemp product, hemp byproduct or THC product that is used in the manufacture, mixing, blending or other creation of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages with regard to nonfood safety violations or suspected violations of this article. This subsection shall not be construed to deny oversight authority to other relevant State agencies concerning their respective oversight duties.(d) Referral to board.--The Department of Agriculture shall refer any suspected nonfood safety violations the Department of Agriculture finds, in the course of a food safety inspection or investigation, to the board for investigation. The board shall 20260HB2309PN3037 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 refer any suspected food safety violations found in the course of a nonfood safety inspection or investigation to the Department of Agriculture for investigation.Section 436-A. Packaging and labeling.(a) Display information.--A licensed manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall include the following on the final container's principal display panel:(1) A label that clearly indicates through text or symbol that the product is only intended for use by individuals 21 years of age and older.(2) A statement of identity that includes the name of the product.(3) A clear description of the product, including:(i) A statement that makes clear that the product contains THC.(ii) A statement that makes clear that the product does not contain alcohol.(4) The total milligram count of all cannabinoids in each serving.(5) A statement encouraging consumers to consume the product slowly and consume products with lower THC content if the consumer is not experienced in the consumption of such products. Acceptable statements may include "Start low, go slow" or "Please consume responsibly."(6) A warning not to consume the product concurrently with alcohol.(b) Final container information.--A licensed manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall include the following on the final container's information panel:(1) The total amount of cannabinoids in milligrams that 20260HB2309PN3037 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the product contains.(2) Any functional ingredients that may be in the product, including caffeine.(c) Label information.--A licensed manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall include the following on the final container's label:(1) A link or scannable code that connects electronically through the Internet to a certificate of analysis and report of laboratory testing for the specific product batch under section 438-A.(2) The manufacturing batch number of the product.(3) Statements that advise of the possible impacts of consuming hemp-derived cannabinoid products, including:(i) "Keep out of reach of children and pets."(ii) "Consuming this product may result in a positive drug test for THC."(iii) "Do not consume this product if you are nursing or pregnant."(iv) "Do not operate a motor vehicle or heavy machinery if under the influence of THC or using this product."(d) Variance.--The variance between what information is listed on the nutrition label and what is actually present in the product shall be whichever is the greater of:(1) 0.25 milligrams of THC; or(2) 10% of the label's stated cannabinoid potency.(e) Dispensing of product.--If a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage is being served outside of the final container by a person licensed under this article, the licensee must have available upon request by the consumer the information outlined 20260HB2309PN3037 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in subsections (a), (b) and (c). The dispensing of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage from a spigot, fountain or other similar device shall be considered to be served outside of the final container.(f) Tamper-evident containers.--Final containers of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall be tamper-evident and indicate to a reasonable consumer if the final container has been opened or compromised.Section 437-A. Advertising of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(a) Advertisements permitted.--Manufacturers, wholesalers, retailers and shippers, whether from outside or inside this Commonwealth, and licensees under this article are permitted to advertise hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and their prices in this Commonwealth. Advertisements shall be subject to all other State laws and regulations. The following apply:(1) Advertisements shall not target or otherwise promote or advertise hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to individuals under 21 years of age.(2) Product labels or containers shall not include designs, names or features designed to appeal to children or individuals under 21 years of age.(3) Product labels and marketing shall not be designed in a way that a person could reasonably mistake the product for a non-hemp-derived cannabinoid product.(4) Product labels and marketing shall not be designed in a way that infringes on third-party copyright or the intellectual property of existing products.(5) A licensee may not distribute, by mail, personally or through servants, agents or employees, price lists, 20260HB2309PN3037 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 circulars or handbills off the licensed premises to the general public as a means of advertising hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(6) Print advertisement of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall not be permitted within 300 feet of a church, school or public playground. This prohibition shall not preclude any point of sale advertisement, menus or other print advertisement regarding hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages inside the licensed premises.(7) Advertisement shall not be permitted in any booklet, program book, yearbook, magazine, newspaper, periodical, brochure, circular or other similar publication published by, for or on behalf of an educational institution.(8) An advertisement may not contain statements that are false, deceptive, or misleading.(b) Definition.--For purposes of this section, the terms "advertisement" and "marketing" shall mean advertising of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages through the medium of radio broadcast, television broadcast, newspapers, periodicals or other publication, outdoor advertisement, any form of electronic transmission or any other printed or graphic matter, including booklets, flyers or cards, or on the product label or attachment itself.Section 438-A. Testing requirements.(a) Testing required.--A manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall test every manufactured batch of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages using an independent, third-party testing facility.(b) Testing facility standards.--A testing facility used by a manufacturer for the testing of hemp-derived cannabinoid 20260HB2309PN3037 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 beverages shall meet the following standards:(1) Must be accredited by the state in which the testing facility operates, maintain an International Organization for Standardization/International Electrotechnical Commission 17025 accreditation for the facility and be licensed by the state in which the testing facility operates to test cannabis products.(2) Must maintain a scope of accreditation for analytes as required in subsection (c).(3) Must maintain testing records, validation reports and standard operating procedures for all tests performed for at least 10 years after the date the test was performed.(c) Concentrations.--A testing facility shall test for the concentrations of the following analytes:(1) Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol.(2) Cannabidiol.(3) Cannabidiolic Acid.(4) Cannabigerol.(5) Cannabinol.(6) Delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol.(7) Other analytes prescribed by the Department of Agriculture.(d) Certificate of analysis.--A testing facility shall issue a certificate of analysis that attests to the concentrations of the analytes outlined in subsection (c).(e) Location of testing facility.--A testing facility may or may not reside in the same state in which the tested product is produced or sold.(f) Rules and regulations.--The Department of Agriculture shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to provide 20260HB2309PN3037 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the health and safety of the public as it relates to testing requirements for hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(g) Adulterated product.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage for which a certificate of analysis cannot be presented shall be considered to be adulterated and subject to detention and condemnation under 3 Pa.C.S. § 5726 (relating to detention and condemnation).Section 439-A. Electronic tracking systems.(a) Duty of grower and provider.--A grower and provider of hemp to persons licensed under this article to manufacture hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or persons licensed to extract THC from hemp shall implement an electronic seed-to-sale tracking system that tracks the hemp from seed to plant until the hemp is sold to a manufacturer or person licensed under this article to extract THC from hemp. The following apply:(1) The system shall include a daily log of each day's beginning inventory, acquisitions, amounts purchased and sold, disbursement, disposals and ending inventory. The tracking system shall include prices paid and amounts collected from manufacturers or persons licensed to extract THC.(2) The system shall include a mechanism for the recall of defective hemp. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "defective hemp" shall mean hemp with a THC content greater than that specified under the definition of "hemp" under section 102.(b) Duty of manufacturer.--A manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall implement an electronic tracking system that tracks hemp or THC extracted from hemp, in whatever form the hemp or THC is received in, from acquisition to 20260HB2309PN3037 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 production of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage to final delivery to a distributor, importing distributor or other final customer. The following apply:(1) The system shall include a daily log of each day's beginning inventory, acquisitions, amounts purchased and sold, disbursement, disposals and ending inventory. The tracking system shall include prices paid and amounts collected from hemp providers or persons licensed to extract THC.(2) The system shall include a mechanism for the recall of adulterated products.(c) Duty of extractor.--A person licensed under this article to extract THC from hemp shall implement an electronic tracking system that tracks the hemp used in extraction from acquisition to processing to sale to a manufacturer. The system shall include a daily log of each day's beginning inventory, acquisitions, amounts purchased and sold, disbursement, disposals and ending inventory. The tracking system shall include prices paid and amounts collected from manufacturers of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(d) Adulterated product.--A manufacturer of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or person licensed to extract THC from hemp shall not accept any hemp or hemp-derived THC extraction from a person who cannot provide appropriate records as outlined in this section. A hemp or THC extract from hemp that cannot be accounted for in an electronic tracking system as outlined in this section, as well as hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages from the hemp or THC extract from hemp shall be considered to be adulterated and subject to detention and condemnation under 3 Pa.C.S. § 5726 (relating to detention and condemnation).20260HB2309PN3037 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Out-of-state manufacturer information.--The board shall determine what information manufacturers of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages that reside outside of this Commonwealth must furnish, upon request, to satisfy the tracking and recordkeeping requirements of this section. The determinations shall not result in a lower standard of information and recordkeeping than is outlined in this section.(f) Rules and regulations.--The Department of Agriculture shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to enforce this section.Section 440-A. Forms and applications may be aligned.The board, for the convenience of the board, licensees and applicants, may align relevant forms, notification requirements, correspondence and applications as needed to include both alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.Section 441-A. Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board is established.(b) Membership.--The Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board shall be composed of the following members:(1) One member appointed by the Governor.(2) Four members appointed by the General Assembly as follows:(i) One individual appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(ii) One individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(iii) One individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(iv) One individual appointed by the Minority Leader 20260HB2309PN3037 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the House of Representatives.(c) Qualifications.--A member of the board must be a resident of this Commonwealth and have substantial experience or expertise in the hemp or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage industry.(d) Service.--A member shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority.(e) Powers and duties.--The Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board has the following powers and duties:(1) Make recommendations to the Secretary of Agriculture to award grants to entities for the purpose of increasing the production of Pennsylvania-made hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and foods and enhancing the Pennsylvania hemp industry through promotion, marketing and research-based programs and projects. Grants shall be awarded through a competitive grant review process. The application for a grant shall include the following information:(i) Purpose for which the grant will be utilized.(ii) Need for the grant.(iii) Estimated budget.(iv) Method for measuring outcome.(v) Other criteria required by the Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board.(2) Require a grant recipient to provide full and complete access to all records relating to the performance of the grant and to submit accurate information.(3) Conduct a thorough annual evaluation of a program for which a grant under this section is made.(4) Seek repayment of money upon a determination that the money was not utilized for the original stated purpose.20260HB2309PN3037 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Submit an annual report to the General Assembly detailing all grants and other actions.(f) Duties of department.--The Department of Agriculture shall assist the Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board in carrying out its powers and duties. Final decisions for awarding grants under subsection (e)(1) shall be made by the Secretary of Agriculture.(g) Transfer.--Annually, the department shall transfer money left in the Local Hemp Sharing Fund after disbursement in compliance with section 403-A(c) to the Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board account.(h) Grants.--The Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board shall allocate money under this subsection for the purpose of awarding grants under subsection (e)(1). The following apply:(1) The Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board may deduct money from the allocation under this subsection to cover the Department of Agriculture's expenses in assisting the Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board.(2) In a fiscal year when grant money authorized under this section remains unallocated, the remaining amount of money shall be made available for grants in subsequent fiscal years.(3) All of the obligations of the board under this section are fulfilled by virtue of the transfer of the annual allocation under this subsection to the Pennsylvania Hemp Marketing Board.Section 442-A. Restriction on contents.(a) Potency.--A serving of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage shall not contain more than 10 milligrams of hemp-derived THC, and no final container of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage 20260HB2309PN3037 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall contain more than 20 milligrams of hemp-derived THC.(b) Kegs exempt.--A keg or other container whose contents are meant to be dispensed through a fountain, spigot, tap or other similar device may contain more than two 10 milligram servings as provided for in subsection (a). Kegs shall dispense servings of at least 300 milliliters, and the total THC in a serving shall not exceed 10 milligrams. A keg shall have uniform milligram levels of THC throughout its contents.(c) Alcohol.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage or hemp-derived cannabinoid food shall not contain alcohol in excess of 0.5% alcohol by volume, whether in the final container or mixed with a noncannabinoid beverage and served by a person licensed under this article.(d) Cannabinoid content.--The following apply to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages:(1) Cannabinoids used in hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages must be derived from, naturally occurring in and directly extracted from the hemp plant.(2) The principal cannabinoid that shall be used in the production of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall be delta-9-THC.(3) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall not contain delta-9(11) exo-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10 THC, THC-O acetate, THC-O-phosphate or hexahydrocannabinol.(4) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall not contain synthetic cannabinoids or other artificially derived cannabinoids, nor shall they contain any cannabinoids derived from any cannabis plant other than hemp.(5) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall be free of microbials such as yeast, mold, bacteria and aspergillus.20260HB2309PN3037 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall be free of contaminants such as mycotoxins, residual solvents, heavy metals and foreign matter.(e) Adulterated product.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage that fails to meet the standards outlined in this section shall be considered adulterated and subject to detention and condemnation under 3 Pa.C.S. § 5726 (relating to detention and condemnation).(f) Rules and regulations.--The Department of Agriculture shall promulgate rules and regulations to enforce this section and provide for the health and safety of the public with respect to the contents of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.Section 443-A. Training required before licensees can sell or manufacture hemp-derived cannabinoid products.(a) Training required.--A person licensed under this article to sell or manufacture hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage ingredients that contain hemp-derived THC shall not sell or manufacture hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage ingredients that contain hemp-derived THC until completion of a training program offered by the board.(b) Training program.--The board shall develop a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage training program. The training program shall include the following:(1) An explanation of the provisions of this article as they relate to hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and hemp-derived ingredients.(2) An explanation of what is expected of the licensee, depending on their licensure, to come into and remain in compliance with this article as it relates to hemp-derived 20260HB2309PN3037 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabinoid beverages and hemp-derived ingredients.(3) A guide on how to encourage safe and responsible use of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(4) A guide on how to keep minors from accessing hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(5) How to report suspected violations of the law to the board or the Department of Agriculture.Section 444-A. Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and alcohol served or manufactured in same establishment.(a) Sales of alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.--A licensee who holds both a license to serve alcohol for on-premise consumption and a license to serve hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for on-premise consumption, or who holds a license allowing for the sale of alcohol for off-premise consumption and a license allowing for the sale of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for off-premises consumption, shall be permitted to sell both alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in the same physical areas and at the same points of sale if each license would independently permit sales of alcohol or hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages in the physical areas or at the points of sale.(b) Applicability.--This section shall apply to a holder of a hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage catering license and permit who also holds a catering license or permit or special occasion permit that allows them to serve or sell alcohol.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the manufacture of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and alcohol at the same licensed establishment, provided that the manufacturer of the hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and/or alcohol holds both a hemp-derived cannabinoid 20260HB2309PN3037 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 beverage manufacturer's license and a license to manufacture alcohol.(d) Calculation of fluid ounces.--In calculating total fluid ounces in accordance with sections 401 and 405-A, fluid ounces of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages shall be calculated separately from fluid ounces of malt and brewed beverages sold, so that a licensee may sell 192 fluid ounces of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and 192 fluid ounces of malt and brewed beverages in the same transaction.(e) Posted warning.--A licensee shall post, at the point of sale for alcohol and hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages meant to be consumed on premises, a warning that states that hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages and alcohol should never be consumed concurrently. The board shall promulgate rules dictating the content, dimensions and form of the postings.Section 445-A. Number of licenses to be issued.(a) Additional licenses.--Additional hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licenses shall not be issued in a county if the total number of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licenses is greater than one license for each 2,000 inhabitants, except the board may issue licenses to public venues, performing arts facilities, hotels and continuing care retirement communities, which are not subject to the limitations of this section.(b) Consideration of licenses.--When determining the number of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licenses already issued in a county, for the purposes of this section, licenses issued to public venues, performing arts facilities, hotels and continuing care retirement communities shall not be considered.(c) Hotels.--20260HB2309PN3037 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) As used in this section, the term "hotel" shall mean a reputable place operated by a responsible person of good reputation where the public may, for a consideration, obtain sleeping accommodations, and which shall have the number of bedrooms and requirements as specified in paragraph (2) and:(i) at least one-half of the required number of bedrooms shall be regularly available to transient guests seven days weekly, except in resort areas;(ii) at least one-third of the bedrooms shall be equipped with hot and cold water, a lavatory, commode, bathtub or shower and a clothes closet; and(iii) an additional one-third of the total of the required rooms shall be equipped with lavatory and commode:(2) Bedrooms and requirements:(i) In municipalities having a population of less than 3,000, a hotel shall have at least 12 permanent bedrooms for the use of guests.(ii) In municipalities having a population of at least 3,000 but less than 10,000, a hotel shall have at least 16 permanent bedrooms for the use of guests.(iii) In municipalities having a population of at least 10,000 but less than 25,000, a hotel shall have at least 30 permanent bedrooms for the use of guests.(iv) In municipalities having a population of at least 25,000 but less than 100,000, a hotel shall have at least 40 permanent bedrooms for the use of guests.(v) In municipalities having a population of at least 100,000, a hotel shall have at least 50 permanent bedrooms for the use of guests.20260HB2309PN3037 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) In a public dining room or rooms operated by the same management accommodating at least 30 persons at one time, a hotel shall have a kitchen, apart from the dining room or rooms, in which food is regularly prepared for the public.(vii) Each room to be considered a bedroom under the requirements of this section shall have an area of not less than 80 square feet and an outside window.Section 446-A. Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license auctions.(a) Conditions for auction.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license shall become available for auction by the board under the following conditions:(1) the license has not been renewed under section 415-A;(2) the license has been revoked under section 423-A; or(3) the licensee has failed to meet the requirements under section 474.1.(b) Unsold licenses.--A license not sold shall be available for sale at a future auctions. No more than 50 licenses shall be auctioned in any county per year.(c) Applicability.--Subsection (b) shall not apply until the auction of all initial offering licenses under section 447-A are complete.(d) Availability of licenses.--A license shall become available for auction by the board the day after the deadline has passed for appealing a decision revoking or not renewing the license.(e) Conduct of auction.--The auction shall be conducted in the manner specified by the board and at the date and time 20260HB2309PN3037 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 selected by the board. After the auction, the board shall provisionally award to the person making the highest bid for the license the right to file an application for the license. The board shall not accept a bid lower than $25,000.(f) Time limit for payment.--The winning bidder shall pay to the board the bid amount within two weeks. Payment shall be by cashier's check, certified check or any other method acceptable to the board. If the winning bidder does not pay the bid amount within two weeks, the second highest bidder shall be awarded the right to file an application for the license, as long as the bid amount is in accordance with subsection (e). The board shall hold the bid amount in escrow until the license is approved.(g) Transfer of license.--Within six months of being awarded the license, the bidder or its assignee shall file an application to transfer the license. The application shall be processed in the same manner as any other transfer application and shall be subject to the same restrictions as any other transfer application, including any conditional licensing agreements and county quota restrictions under section 445-A. The board shall only approve the transfer of a license under this section to a municipality, other than the municipality it last operated in, upon approval by the governing body of the municipality.(h) Unpaid fines, unserved suspensions, liens or judgments not applicable.--Once a license has become available as specified in this section, the license may no longer be subject to unpaid fines, unserved suspensions, liens or judgments accrued by the previous license holder. A winning bidder under this section shall not be required to supply any information about or secure any information from the previous license holder 20260HB2309PN3037 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 during the application process. A license acquired under this section may subsequently be transferred subject to any restrictions that would otherwise be applicable to the transfer of the license.Section 447-A. Hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail license initial offering.(a) Initial offering.--No later than one year after the effective date of this article, the board shall hold in each county an initial offering of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licenses.(b) Auctions.--The offering shall consist of an initial auction with not less than one-third and not more than one-half of the available hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage retail licenses available for bidding. The second auction, which shall be held no less than 30 days and no more than 45 days after the initial auction, shall have all remaining licenses available for bidding.(c) Manner of auctions.--The auctions conducted under this section shall be in the same manner as auctions conducted by the board under section 446-A.Section 448-A. Sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages by Pennsylvania Liquor Stores.(a) Offering.--The board may offer for sale in Pennsylvania Liquor Stores hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for consumption off-premises.(b) Regulations.--The board may, in the context of retail sales of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages by Pennsylvania Liquor Stores, adopt regulations regarding:(1) The acquisition of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages for retail sale in Pennsylvania Liquor Stores.20260HB2309PN3037 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The varieties and brands of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to be kept and sold in Pennsylvania Liquor Stores.(3) The pricing of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages sold in Pennsylvania Liquor Stores. The pricing scheme may offer flexibility in maximizing the return on hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage products sold by Pennsylvania Liquor Stores and discounting discontinued items.(4) The conduct of employees regarding the acquisition, sale, transportation, handling, and storage of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(5) The books and records to be kept regarding the sale, transportation, handling and storage of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages.(c) Special orders.--The board may choose not to accept special orders for hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages. If the board chooses to accept special orders, the process shall mirror as close as possible the process for special orders of alcohol.(d) Uniform prices.--The retail price of hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages offered for sale by the board shall be uniform across all Pennsylvania Liquor Stores.(e) Pennsylvania Liquor Stores.--A hemp-derived cannabinoid beverage final container shall not be opened on the premises of a Pennsylvania Liquor Store. A manager or other employee of the board employed in a Pennsylvania Liquor Store shall not allow any hemp-derived cannabinoid beverages to be consumed on the store premises.Section 449-A. Regulations generally.(a) Authorization.--In accordance with this article, the board, the Department of Banking and Securities and the Department of Agriculture shall each promulgate regulations as 20260HB2309PN3037 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may be necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this article.(b) Temporary regulations.--(1) To facilitate the prompt implementation of this article and in accordance with this article, the board, the Department of Banking and Securities and the Department of Agriculture shall each issue temporary regulations as may be necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this article. The following shall apply to the temporary regulations:(i) The board, the Department of Banking and Securities and the Department of Agriculture must issue the temporary regulations within six months of the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this six-month period shall be promulgated as provided by statute.(ii) Upon the issuance of their respective temporary regulations, the board, the Department of Banking and Securities and the Department of Agriculture shall transmit notice of the issuance of the temporary regulations to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(iii) The board, the Department of Banking and Securities and the Department of Agriculture shall post their respective temporary regulations on their respective publicly accessible Internet websites.(iv) The temporary regulations shall expire no later than two years following publication of the temporary regulations in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.20260HB2309PN3037 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The temporary regulations under paragraph (1) shall be exempt from the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) Permanent regulations.--Prior to the expiration of the temporary regulations, the board, the Department of Banking and Securities and the Department of Agriculture shall each propose for approval permanent regulations as provided by statute.Section 6. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The addition of section 449-A of the act.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect upon the publication of the last of the temporary regulations issued by the board, the Department of Banking and Securities and the Department of Agriculture in accordance with section 449-A of the act.20260HB2309PN3037 - 98 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526